Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1569XS (4) 91 cm/jh S.F. 184 Section 1. Section 614.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 11A. Sexual abuse, human trafficking, and 3 sexual exploitation of a minor. No time limitation shall apply 4 to an action brought for damages for an injury suffered as 5 a result of sexual abuse as defined in section 709.1, sexual 6 abuse in the first degree in violation of section 709.2, sexual 7 abuse in the second degree in violation of section 709.3, 8 sexual abuse in the third degree in violation of section 709.4, 9 sexual exploitation by a counselor, therapist, school employee, 10 or adult providing training or instruction in violation of 11 section 709.15, human trafficking in violation of section 12 710A.2, and sexual exploitation of a minor in violation of 13 section 728.12. This subsection shall apply regardless of the 14 theory of liability in the civil action, including against 15 civil defendants who were not liable in the related criminal 16 action, if any. 17 Sec. 2. Section 614.1, subsection 12, Code 2025, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 12. Sexual abuse or sexual exploitation by a counselor, 20 therapist, school employee, or adult providing training or 21 instruction. An action for damages for injury suffered as 22 a result of sexual abuse, as defined in section 709.1 , by a 23 counselor, therapist, school employee, or adult providing 24 training or instruction, as defined in section 709.15 , or as a 25 result of sexual exploitation by a counselor, therapist, school 26 employee, or adult providing training or instruction as defined 27 in section 709.15, shall be brought within five years of the 28 date the victim was last treated by the counselor or therapist, 29 or within five years of the date the victim was last enrolled 30 in or attended the school. 31 Sec. 3. Section 669.13, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 32 to read as follows: 33 1. Except as provided in section 614.1, subsections 11A 34 and 12, and section 614.8, a claim or suit otherwise permitted 35 -1- LSB 1569XS (4) 91 cm/jh 1/ 3 S.F. 184 under this chapter shall be forever barred, unless within two 1 years after the claim accrued, the claim is made in writing and 2 filed with the director of the department of management under 3 this chapter . The time to begin a suit under this chapter 4 shall be extended for a period of six months from the date 5 of mailing of notice to the claimant by the attorney general 6 as to the final disposition of the claim or from the date of 7 withdrawal of the claim under section 669.5 , if the time to 8 begin suit would otherwise expire before the end of the period. 9 Sec. 4. Section 670.5, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, 10 is amended to read as follows: 11 Except as provided in section 614.1, subsections 11A 12 and 12, and section 614.8, a person who claims damages from 13 any municipality or any officer, employee or agent of a 14 municipality for or on account of any wrongful death, loss, or 15 injury within the scope of section 670.2 or section 670.8 or 16 under common law shall commence an action therefor within two 17 years after the alleged wrongful death, loss, or injury. 18 Sec. 5. REPEAL. Section 614.8A, Code 2025, is repealed. 19 Sec. 6. REVIVAL. 20 1. Every claim or cause of action brought against any party 21 alleging intentional or negligent acts or omissions by a person 22 for physical, psychological, or other injury or condition 23 suffered as a result of conduct which would constitute sexual 24 abuse as defined in section 709.1, which is barred as of the 25 effective date of this Act because the applicable period of 26 limitation has expired or the plaintiff previously failed to 27 file a petition, is hereby revived. 28 2. Dismissal of such a previous action, ordered before the 29 effective date of this Act, on grounds that the action was 30 time-barred, or for failure of a party to file a petition, 31 shall not be grounds for dismissal of a revival action pursuant 32 to this section. 33 Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 34 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 35 -2- LSB 1569XS (4) 91 cm/jh 2/ 3 S.F. 184